Massachusetts, session 194th, H4975.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (c) of section 1 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing
in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the word “408(q)”, in line 10,
the following clause:- ; and provided further that for purposes of section 1400Z, the term
“qualified opportunity zone” shall mean “an area located entirely within the commonwealth that
is designated as a qualified opportunity zone under said section 1400Z-2;” and provided further
that “Code” shall not include reference to certain other amendments to the Internal Revenue
Code pursuant to section 90 of chapter 62C.
SECTION 2. Paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of section 2 of said chapter 62, as so
appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following subclause:-
(R) The deductions allowed by 70302(f) of Pub. L. 119–21.
of 8

SECTION 3. Section 2 of chapter 62B, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out the figure “$1,200”, the first time it appears, and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- $2,000, adjusted for inflation as provided by subsection (h)
of section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended and in effect for the taxable year;.
SECTION 4. Said section 2 of said chapter 62B, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by the striking out the figure “$1,200”, the second time it appears, and inserting in
place thereof the following figure:- $2,000.
SECTION 5. Chapter 62C, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended
by adding the following section:-
Section 90. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), an amendment of the Internal
Revenue Code as would otherwise apply under chapter 62 or chapter 63, that would affect the
determination of Massachusetts gross income or Massachusetts deductions under chapter 62 or
gross income under paragraph 3 of section 30 of chapter 63 or net income under paragraph 4 of
section 30 of chapter 63, shall not apply to:
(1) any taxable year that begins in the calendar year in which the amendment is enacted;
or
(2) any taxable year that precedes the calendar year in which the amendment is enacted.
(b) Subsection (a) shall not apply to an amendment of the Internal Revenue Code if the
commissioner determines within 90 days after such amendment is enacted that the impact to tax
revenue collected pursuant to chapter 62 or chapter 63 is estimated to be less than $20,000,000,
of 8

adjusted for inflation as provided by subsection (f) of section 1 of the Internal Revenue Code, as
amended and in effect for the taxable year, for:
(1) the fiscal year that begins during the calendar year in which the amendment is enacted; or
(2) any fiscal year that precedes the calendar year in which the amendment is enacted.
(c) For the purposes of this section, the definition of “Code” in section 1 of this chapter shall not
apply.
SECTION 6. Section 30 of chapter 63 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out paragraph 3 and inserting in place thereof the
following paragraph:-
3. ''Gross income'', gross income as defined under the provisions of the Federal Internal
Revenue Code, as amended and in effect for the taxable year, plus the interest from bonds, notes
and evidences of indebtedness of any state, including this commonwealth; provided, however, (i)
that gross income of corporations taxable under section 38B shall, in addition to the foregoing,
include a deduction for losses from the sale or exchange of capital assets sustained during the
taxable year to the extent allowable by the Federal Internal Revenue Code; (ii) for purposes of
applying section 1400Z-2 of the Code, the term “qualified opportunity zone” shall mean “an area
located entirely within Massachusetts that is designated as a qualified opportunity zone under
said section 1400Z-2;” and (iii) certain Code amendments as referenced in section 90 of chapter
62C will have no force or effect.
SECTION 7. Paragraph 4 of said section 30 of said chapter 63, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “allowed,” the first time it appears, the following words:-
of 8

and provided further that certain Code amendments as referenced in section 90 of chapter 62C
will have no force or effect.
SECTION 8. Said paragraph 4 of said section 30 of said chapter 63, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by adding the following clause:
(ix) the deductions allowed by section 70302(f) of Pub. L. 119–21.
SECTION 9. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 63D the
following chapter:-
Chapter 63E
TAXATION OF PASS-THROUGH ENTITIES ON INCOME EXCEEDING SURTAX
THRESHOLD
Section 1. As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
''Code'', the Internal Revenue Code of the United States as defined in section 1 of chapter
62.
''Commissioner'', the commissioner of revenue.
''Eligible pass-through entity'', an S corporation under section 1361 of the Code, a
partnership under section 7701 of the Code or a limited liability company that is treated as an S
corporation or partnership under said section 1361 of the Code or said section 7701 of the Code.
''Qualified income taxable in Massachusetts'', the income of an eligible pass-through
entity determined under chapter 62 allocable to a qualified member and included in the qualified
of 8

member's Massachusetts taxable income under said chapter 62; provided, however, that qualified
income taxable in Massachusetts shall be limited to the sum of the amounts by which the amount
allocated to each qualified member exceeds the surtax threshold.
''Qualified member'', a shareholder of an S corporation or a partner in a partnership,
including a member of a limited liability company that is treated as an S corporation or
partnership under section 1361 of the Code or section 7701 of the Code, that is a natural person
or trust or estate subject to tax under section 10 of chapter 62; provided, however, that a qualified
member may be a resident, nonresident or a part-year resident; provided further, that “qualified
member” does not include such shareholder, partner or member whose allocable share of income
included in their Massachusetts taxable income under said chapter 62 does not exceed the surtax
threshold.
Section 2. An eligible pass-through entity may elect to pay an excise on its qualified
income taxable in Massachusetts at a rate of 4 per cent. A qualified member of an electing
eligible pass-through entity shall be allowed a refundable credit against the tax imposed under
this chapter. The credit shall be available to qualified members in an amount proportionate to
each qualified member's share of the tax due and paid under this chapter by the eligible pass-
through entity multiplied by 0.9. The credit shall be available for the member's taxable year in
which the electing eligible pass-through entity's taxable year ends.
Section 3. This chapter shall not apply to any taxable year for which the federal limitation
on the state and local tax deduction imposed by section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code
of the United States, as amended and in effect for the applicable year, has expired or is otherwise
not in effect.
of 8

Section 4. The excise under this chapter shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any
other Massachusetts tax required to be paid, including tax imposed by chapter 62 or chapter 63.
The excise under this chapter shall be due and payable on the eligible pass-through entity's
original, timely-filed return. A return that reports the excise shall be due at the same time as a
partnership information return or corporate excise return would be due for the entity under
chapter 62C. Nothing in this chapter shall alter any filing requirements for a qualified member
100 under said chapter 62C.
101 Section 5. The collection and administration of the excise under this chapter shall be
102 governed by chapter 62C unless expressly provided otherwise in this chapter or in regulations
103 promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter.
104 Section 6. The election under this chapter shall be made by the eligible pass-through
105 entity on an annual basis in a manner determined by the commissioner. All members of the
106 electing eligible pass-through entity shall be bound by the election. Once an election is made for
107 a particular year, the election shall not be revoked.
108 Section 7. The commissioner shall promulgate regulations or guidance to carry out the
109 purposes of this chapter. Such regulations or guidance may: (i) make the credit available to
110 qualified members with income from eligible pass-through entities that in turn have income from
111 other eligible pass-through entities; (ii) provide rules on the application of this chapter to eligible
112 trusts and estates; and (iii) require estimated payments of the excise by electing eligible pass-
113 through entities and their qualified members in a manner consistent with chapter 62B.
of 8

114 SECTION 10. Section 6 of chapter 175M, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
115 hereby amended by striking out, the figure “40”, in lines 22, 33 and 39, each time it appears and
116 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- 100.
117 SECTION 11. Said section 6 of said chapter 175M, as so appearing, is hereby amended
118 by striking out the figure “100”, in lines 25, 33 and 43, each time it appears, and inserting in
119 place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- 40.
120 SECTION 12. Notwithstanding subparagraph (1) of paragraph (d) of section 2 of chapter
121 62 of the General Laws and paragraph 4 of section 30 of chapter 63 of the General Laws, the
122 deduction allowed by section 174A of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended and in effect for
123 the current tax year is disallowed for taxable years beginning in 2025.
124 Notwithstanding subparagraph (1) of paragraph (d) of section 2 of chapter 62 of the
125 General Laws and paragraph 4 of section 30 of chapter 63 of the General Laws, the following
126 deductions are disallowed for taxable years beginning in 2025 and 2026: (i) the deduction
127 allowed by section 168(n) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended and in effect for the current
128 tax year; (ii) the deduction described by section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code to the extent
129 increased by amendments to sections 179(b)(1) and 179(b)(2) of said Internal Revenue Code
130 inserted by section 70306 of Pub. L. 119–21; and (iii) the deduction described by section 163(j)
131 of the Internal Revenue Code to the extent the definition of “adjusted taxable income” is
132 modified by an amendment to section 163(j)(8)(A)(v) of said Internal Revenue Code inserted by
133 section 70303 of Pub. L. 119–21.
of 8

134 Notwithstanding paragraph 3 of section 30 of chapter 63 of the General Laws, a taxpayer
135 shall, for taxable years beginning in 2025 or 2026, apply section 1400Z-2 of the Internal
136 Revenue Code as in effect for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2026.
137 SECTION 13. Sections 1, 5 through 7, inclusive, and 9 through 11, inclusive, shall apply
138 for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
139 SECTION 14. Sections 2 and 8 shall apply for taxable years beginning on or after
140 January 1, 2025.
141 SECTION 15. Sections 3 and 4 shall apply beginning with payments made on or after
142 January 1, 2026.
of 8